Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 7. Relationship to Third Parties.

Sec. 10.50.250.
Agency power of members and managers.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, a member of a limited liability company is an agent of the company for the purpose of conducting the company’s affairs. A member’s act, including the execution of an instrument in the name of the company, that appears to be performed in the usual and customary way of conducting business, binds the company, unless the member does not in fact have the authority to act for the company in the particular matter and the person with whom the member is dealing knows that the member does not have the authority to act for the company in the particular matter.

If a limited liability company is managed by a manager, a member is not, solely by reason of being a member, an agent of the company.

If a limited liability company is managed by a manager, a manager is an agent of a limited liability company for the purpose of conducting its affairs, and a manager’s act, including the execution of an instrument in the name of the company, that appears to be performed in the usual and customary way of conducting business binds the company, unless the manager does not in fact have the authority to act for the company in the particular matter and the person with whom the manager is dealing knows that the manager does not have the authority to act for the company in the particular matter.

A limited liability company manager’s or member’s act that does not appear to be performed in the usual and customary way of conducting business does not bind the company, unless the act is authorized by an operating agreement of the company when the act is performed or at another time.

A limited liability company manager’s or member’s act that contravenes a restriction on the manager’s or member’s authority does not bind the company with regard to persons who know about the restriction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.255.
Admissions and representations by members and managers.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, an admission or representation made by a member of a limited liability company about the affairs of the company is evidence against the company if the admission or representation is within the scope of the member’s authority under this chapter.

If a limited liability company is managed by a manager, an admission or representation made by a

manager about the affairs of the company is evidence against the company if the admission or representation is within the scope of the manager’s authority under this chapter; and

member, acting solely in the capacity of a member, is not evidence against the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.260.
Limited liability company charged with knowledge of or notice to member or manager.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, and except for a fraud on the company committed by or with the consent of the member who has the knowledge or receives the notice, the following operate as notice to or knowledge of a limited liability company:

notice given to a company member of a matter relating to the affairs of the company;

the knowledge of a company member acting in the particular matter, whether acquired while a member or known at the time of becoming a member; and

the knowledge of a company member who reasonably could and should have communicated the knowledge to a member acting in the particular matter.

If the company is managed by a manager, the following operate as notice to or knowledge of a limited liability company, except for a fraud on the company committed by or with the consent of the manager who has the knowledge or receives the notice:

notice given to a manager of a matter relating to the affairs of the limited liability company;

the knowledge of the manager acting in the particular matter, acquired while a manager or known at the time of becoming a manager; and

the knowledge of a company manager who reasonably could and should have communicated the knowledge to the manager acting in the particular matter.

If the company is managed by a manager, notice to, or the knowledge of, a member of a limited liability company while the member is acting solely in the capacity of a member does not operate as notice to or knowledge of the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.265.
Liability of members to third parties.

A person who is a member of a limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company is not liable, solely by reason of being a member, under a judgment, decree, or order of a court, or in another manner, for a liability of the company to a third party, whether the liability arises in contract, tort, or another form, or for the acts or omissions of another member, manager, agent, or employee of the company to a third party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 6 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.